Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-93] Disposal of unused and expired
specimens. The department is authorized to dispose of unused specimens and
samples, unused portions of specimens and samples, and expired specimens and
samples in the normal course of business and in compliance with part XI of this
chapter and in a reasonable manner as long as the disposal method is designed
to protect the identity and origin of specimens and samples from disclosure to
third persons who are not a part of law enforcement. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next